Colorado, session 2026A, HB1037.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Fourth
Amendment is Not for Sale Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The fourth amendment to the United States constitution
guarantees that "[t]he right of the people to be secure in their persons,
houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures,
shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable
cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the
place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized";
(b) The United States supreme court has observed, "Few
protections are as essential to individual liberty as the right to be free
from unreasonable searches and seizures. The Framers made that right
explicit in the Bill of Rights following their experience with the
indignities and invasions of privacy wrought by general warrants and
warrantless searches that had so alienated the colonists and had helped
speed the movement for independence. Ever mindful of the Fourth
Amendment and its history, the Court has viewed with disfavor practices
that permit police officers unbridled discretion to rummage at will among
a person's private effects." Byrd v. United States, 584 U.S. 395, 402-403
-2- HB26-1037

(2018). Accordingly, "As technology has enhanced the Government's
capacity to encroach upon areas normally guarded from inquisitive eyes,
[the United States Supreme] Court has sought to assure preservation of
that degree of privacy against government that existed when the Fourth
Amendment was adopted." Carpenter v. United States, 585 U.S. 296, 305
(2018).
(c) In People v. Seymour, 536 P.3d 1260 (Colo. 2023), the
Colorado supreme court stated that Colorado is not bound by the United
States supreme court's interpretation of the fourth amendment when
determining the scope of state constitutional protections. The court stated
that article II, section 7 provides even greater privacy protections than the
fourth amendment, and Colorado has "long rejected the third-party
doctrine under that provision of the Colorado Constitution," further
stating that "[g]iven the enduring and related privacy concerns presented
by a search of an individual's online search history, we see no reason to
change course here."
(d) Law enforcement has been able to effectively and efficiently
enforce our criminal laws for more than 230 years without needing to
evade fourth amendment warrant requirements that are essential to
protecting Americans' liberty and privacy in the digital age.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 16-3-303.3 as
follows:
16-3-303.3. Prohibition on the bulk purchase of data from
third parties by law enforcement - evidence inadmissible in court -
definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
-3- HB26-1037

(a) "EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF VALUE" MEANS TO OBTAIN OR
RECEIVE ACCESS TO AN ITEM, DATA, OR INFORMATION:
(I) IN EXCHANGE FOR MONEY OR OTHER VALUABLE
CONSIDERATION;
(II) IN CONNECTION WITH SERVICES OR BENEFITS PROVIDED AS
CONSIDERATION; OR
(III) AS PART OF THE PROVISION OF A FEE, INCLUDING AN ACCESS
FEE, SERVICE FEE, MAINTENANCE FEE, OR LICENSING FEE.
(b) "GOVERNMENT ENTITY" HAS THE SAME MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 16-3-303.5, INCLUDING A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.
(c) "LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY" MEANS AN AGENCY OR OTHER
INSTRUMENTALITY OF A GOVERNMENT ENTITY, INCLUDING AN EMPLOYEE
OR AGENT OF THE ENTITY, THAT IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW, REGULATION, OR
GOVERNMENTAL POLICY TO ENGAGE IN OR SUPERVISE THE PREVENTION,
DETECTION, INVESTIGATION, OR PROSECUTION OF A VIOLATION OF
CRIMINAL LAW.
(d) "PERSONAL DATA" MEANS INFORMATION COLLECTED FROM OR
GENERATED BY A SPECIFIC PERSON AS PART OF A CONSUMER TRANSACTION
OR THE USE OF A CONSUMER PRODUCT OR SERVICE, WHETHER THE
INFORMATION WAS COLLECTED BY THE ORIGINAL THIRD PARTY OR
OBTAINED BY A DIFFERENT THIRD PARTY, THAT IS CONNECTED OR
REASONABLY CONNECTED TO THE SPECIFIC PERSON OR THE SPECIFIC
PERSON'S ELECTRONIC DEVICE. PERSONAL DATA INCLUDES, BUT IS NOT
LIMITED TO, A PERSON'S:
(I) NAME;
(II) BILLING INFORMATION OR ADDRESS;
(III) SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
-4- HB26-1037

(IV) HOME ADDRESS;
(V) DEMOGRAPHIC DATA;
(VI) WEB BROWSING OR SEARCH HISTORY;
(VII) APPLICATION USAGE HISTORY;
(VIII) PRECISE GEOLOCATION DATA, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
6-1-1303;
(IX) FINANCIAL INFORMATION;
(X) HEALTH INFORMATION;
(XI) BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303;
(XII) BIOLOGICAL DATA, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303;
(XIII) CHARACTERISTICS OF PROTECTED CLASSIFICATIONS UNDER
STATE OR FEDERAL LAW;
(XIV) DEVICE IDENTIFIER, INCLUDING A MEDIA ACCESS CONTROL
ADDRESS, INTERNATIONAL MOBILE EQUIPMENT IDENTIFIER, OR INTERNET
PROTOCOL ADDRESS;
(XV) COMMUNICATIONS CONTENT; AND
(XVI) PROFILES OR INFERENCES ABOUT AN INDIVIDUAL BASED ON
DATA POINTS COLLECTED OR ACQUIRED FROM THIRD PARTIES.
(e) "THIRD PARTY" MEANS A PERSON WHO:
(I) IS NOT A GOVERNMENT ENTITY; AND
(II) IS NOT THE PERSON TO WHOM THE PERSONAL DATA PERTAINS.
(f) "WIDELY DISTRIBUTED MEDIA" MEANS CONTENT THAT IS MADE
AVAILABLE TO A LARGE, GENERAL AUDIENCE THROUGH CHANNELS THAT
ALLOW BROAD ACCESS AND REGULAR DISSEMINATION, AS OPPOSED TO
PRIVATE, NICHE, OR RESTRICTED COMMUNICATIONS.
(2) IN CONNECTION WITH A CRIMINAL, CIVIL, OR OTHER
INVESTIGATORY OR ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITY:
-5- HB26-1037

(a) A LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY SHALL NOT OBTAIN OR RECEIVE
ACCESS TO AN INDIVIDUAL'S PERSONAL DATA FROM A THIRD PARTY IN
EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF VALUE;
(b) A LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY SHALL NOT REQUEST, OBTAIN, OR
RECEIVE ACCESS TO AN INDIVIDUAL'S PERSONAL DATA FROM A FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OR OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCY OR
DEPARTMENT IF THE DATA WAS OBTAINED FROM A THIRD PARTY IN
EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF VALUE;
(c) A LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY SHALL NOT SHARE ON A
THIRD-PARTY PLATFORM OR SELL, IN EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF VALUE,
AN INDIVIDUAL'S PERSONAL DATA TO A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OR OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT, OR A
THIRD PARTY IF THE PERSONAL DATA WAS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
COLLECTED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY; AND
(d) A GOVERNMENT ENTITY, INCLUDING A LAW ENFORCEMENT
ENTITY, SHALL NOT PROVIDE OR SHARE WITH A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT AN INDIVIDUAL'S PERSONAL
DATA OBTAINED FROM A THIRD PARTY IN EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF
VALUE.
(3) SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY WHEN:
(a) A LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY HAS OBTAINED A VALID JUDICIAL
WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER, AND ANY ACCOMPANYING
AFFIDAVIT TO EACH PARTY, PURSUANT TO RULE 16 OF THE COLORADO
RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR RULE, FOR THE
PERSONAL DATA OF THE SPECIFICALLY IDENTIFIED INDIVIDUAL;
(b) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY ASSERTS IN GOOD FAITH THAT
AN EMERGENCY SITUATION EXISTS THAT INVOLVES THE RISK OF DEATH OR
-6- HB26-1037

SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO A PERSON THAT REQUIRES IMMEDIATE
DISCLOSURE;
(c) THE PERSONAL DATA IS LAWFULLY AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC
THROUGH GOVERNMENT RECORDS OR WIDELY DISTRIBUTED MEDIA;
(d) THE PERSONAL DATA PERTAINS TO A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL, WAS
VOLUNTARILY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC BY THE SPECIFIC
INDIVIDUAL, AND WAS OBTAINED IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE
LAWS, REGULATIONS, CONTRACTS, PRIVACY POLICIES, AND TERMS OF
SERVICE;
(e) THE SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM THE PERSONAL DATA
PERTAINS INTENDED LAW ENFORCEMENT TO BE A RECIPIENT OF THE
PERSONAL DATA, AS EVIDENCED BY CASE-SPECIFIC, EXPRESS CONSENT
FROM THE SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL;
(f) THE THIRD PARTY PROVIDING THE PERSONAL DATA WAS
AUTHORIZED BY THE SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM THE PERSONAL DATA
PERTAINS TO PROVIDE THE DATA TO THE LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY, AS
EVIDENCED BY CASE-SPECIFIC, EXPRESS CONSENT FROM THE SPECIFIC
INDIVIDUAL; OR
(g) THE PERSONAL DATA IS PROVIDED TO OR BY THE NATIONAL
CENTER FOR MISSING AND EXPLOITED CHILDREN OR ITS SUCCESSOR ENTITY
AND IS RELATED TO AN INVESTIGATION INVOLVING A MISSING OR
EXPLOITED CHILD.
(4) SUBSECTIONS (3)(d) TO (3)(f) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT
VIOLATE SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION IF THE PERSON MADE THEIR
PERSONAL DATA PUBLICLY AVAILABLE, EVEN IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
ENTITY PURCHASES THE PERSONAL DATA FROM A THIRD PARTY.
(5) (a) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES AN INJURY,
-7- HB26-1037

AND A PERSON WHO IS INJURED MAY BRING A LEGAL ACTION FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, DECLARATORY RELIEF, OR OTHER RELIEF DEEMED
NECESSARY TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION. A PLAINTIFF MAY SEEK REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) A COURT SHALL NOT ADMIT PERSONAL DATA ACQUIRED IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THAT
INFORMATION AT A TRIAL, HEARING, OR OTHER PROCEEDING UNLESS THE
PARTY SEEKING TO INTRODUCE THE EVIDENCE PROVIDES A COPY OF THE
VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR COURT ORDER AND ANY
ACCOMPANYING AFFIDAVIT TO EACH PARTY PURSUANT TO RULE 16 OF THE
COLORADO RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR RULE.
(II) A COURT MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION
(5)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION IF THE COURT FINDS THAT IT WAS NOT POSSIBLE
TO PROVIDE A PARTY WITH THE VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT, SUBPOENA, OR
COURT ORDER AND ANY ACCOMPANYING APPLICATION WITHIN THE TIME
REQUIRED BY RULE 16 OF THE COLORADO RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE,
OR ANY SUCCESSOR RULE, AND THE COURT FINDS THAT THE PARTY WILL
NOT BE PREJUDICED BY THE DELAY IN RECEIVING THE INFORMATION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-3-303.5, add (9)
as follows:
16-3-303.5. Location information - search warrant required
- definitions.
(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION AUTHORIZES A GOVERNMENT ENTITY
TO OBTAIN LOCATION INFORMATION OF AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE IN
EXCHANGE FOR ANYTHING OF VALUE IN VIOLATION OF SECTION
16-3-303.3.
-8- HB26-1037

SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-9- HB26-1037